ro-RO: Tip de arbaletă: Compound; Pistol; Recurve; Cu repetiție; Cu tragere inversă; Cu auto-armare; Altele
sv: Armborsttyp: Compound; Pistol; Recurve; Repeterande; Omvänd dragning; Självspännande; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta samostrela: Složeni; Pištolj; Zakrivljeni; S ponavljanjem; S obrnutim potegom; Samozatezajući; Ostalo
es: Tipo de ballesta: Compuesta; De pistola; Recurva; De repetición; De tiro invertido; De amartillado automático; Otro
ja: クロスボウタイプ: コンパウンド; ピストル; リカーブ; リピーティング; リバースドロー; セルフコッキング; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de besta: Composta; Pistola; Recurva; Repetição; Tração invertida; Armamento automático; Outro
fr: Type d’arbalète: À poulies; Pistolet; Classique; À répétition; À arc inversé; À armement automatique; Autre
da: Armbrøsttype: Compound; Pistol; Recurve; Repeterende; Reverse draw; Selvspændende; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de besta: Composto; Pistola; Recurvo; De repetição; Tração reversa; Armação automática; Outro
it: Tipo di balestra: Compound; A pistola; Ricurva; A ripetizione; A trazione inversa; Autocaricante; Altro
el: Τύπος βαλλίστρας: Σύνθετη; Πιστόλι; Κυρτή; Επαναληπτική; Αντίστροφης έλξης; Αυτοοπλιζόμενη; Άλλο
hu: Számszeríj típusa: Csigás; Pisztoly; Reflex; Ismétlő; Fordított; Önfelhúzó; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип арбалет: Полиспастен; Пистолетен; Рефлексен; Многозаряден; С обратно теглене; Самовзвеждащ се; Други
en: Crossbow type: Compound; Pistol; Recurve; Repeating; Reverse draw; Self-cocking; Other
pl: Typ kuszy: Blokowa; Pistoletowa; Refleksyjna; Powtarzalna; Odwrotnego naciągu; Samonapinająca; Inne
ru: Тип арбалета: Блочный; Пистолетный; Рекурсивный; Многозарядный; С обратными плечами; С самовзводом; Другое
sk-SK: Typ kuše: Kladková; Pištoľová; Reflexná; Opakovacia; S opačným ťahom; Samonapínacia; Iné
zh-TW: 弩類型: 複合弓; 手槍型; 反曲弓; 連發型; 反向拉弓; 自行上膛型; 其他
lt-LT: Arbaleto tipas: Skriemulinis; Pistoletinis; Riestinis; Daugiašūvis; Atvirkštinio tempimo; Savaime užsitaisantis; Kita
de: Armbrusttyp: Compound; Pistole; Recurve; Repetier; Reverse-Draw; Selbstspannend; Sonstige
nb: Armbrøsttype: Trinse; Pistol; Recurve; Repeterende; Omvendt trekk; Selvspennende; Annet
ko: 석궁 유형: 컴파운드; 피스톨; 리커브; 리피팅; 리버스 드로우; 셀프 코킹; 기타
cs: Typ kuše: Kladková; Pistolová; Reflexní; Opakovací; S reverzním nátahem; Samonatahovací; Ostatní
tr: Arbalet tipi: Makaralı; Tabanca; Klasik; Tekrarlayan; Ters çekim; Kendinden kurmalı; Diğer
nl: Kruisboog type: Compound; Pistool; Recurve; Repeterend; Reverse draw; Zelfspannend; Overig
th: ประเภทหน้าไม้: คอมพาวนด์; พกสั้น; รีเคิร์ฟ; แบบยิงซ้ำ; แบบดึงกลับ; ขึ้นลำอัตโนมัติ; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại nỏ: Compound (ròng rọc); Nỏ ngắn (pistol); Recurve (cánh ngược); Nỏ liên châu; Nỏ cánh ngược ra trước; Tự lên dây; Khác
zh-CN: 弩型: 复合; 手枪式; 反曲; 连发; 反向牵引; 自上膛; 其他
fi: Varsijousityyppi: Taljajousi; Pistooli; Vastakaari; Toistava; Käänteinen veto; Itselataava; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta samostrela: Sestavljeni; Pištola; Zakrivljeni; Repetirni; Obratni poteg; Samonapenjalni; Drugo